en: Salty snacks
bg: Солени закуски
ca: Aperitius salats
da: Salte snacks
de: salzige Snacks
es: Snacks salados
fi: suolaiset naposteltavat
fr: Snacks salés
he: חטיפים מלוחים
hr: Slane grickalice
hu: Sós ételek, Sós élelmiszerek
it: Snacks salati
lt: Sūrūs užkandžiai
nl: Zoute snacks
pl: Słone przekąski
pt: Petiscos salgados
ro: Gustări sărate
ru: Солёные закуски
sv: Salta snacks, Salta tilltugg
tr: Tuzlu atıştırmalıklar
zh: 咸味零食

en: Wasabi coated peas
fr: Pois au wasabi, Pois wasabi

en: Tiger nuts
fr: Souchet
nl: Tijgernoten, tijgernoot

en: Nuts and their products
bg: Ядкови продукти
ca: Fruits secs i derivats
cs: Ořechy a výrobky z nich
da: Nødder og nøddeprodukter
de: Nüsse und Nussprodukte
es: Frutos de cáscara y derivados, Frutos de cáscara y sus productos, Frutos secos y sus productos
fi: pähkinät ja pähkinätuotteet
fr: Fruits à coques et dérivés
he: אגוזים ומוצריהם
hr: Orasi i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Diófélék és termékeik
it: Noci ed i loro prodotti
lt: Riešutai ir jų produktai
nl: Noten en -producten
pl: Orzechy i ich produkty
pt: Nozes e seus produtos
ru: Орехи и продукты из орехов
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากถั่วเปลือกแข็ง
tr: Çerez ve çerez ürünleri
zh: 坚果及其制品

en: Flavoured nuts
fr: Fruits de coques aromatisées
nl: Gearomatiseerde noten

en: Fruits-Nuts-Seed variety packs
de: Früchte-Nüsse-Samen Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de combinación de fruta - frutos secos y semillas
fr: Assortiments de Fruits - Noix et Graines
hr: Pakiranja sorti voće-orašasti plodovi-sjemenke
it: Confezioni miste di semi/frutta/frutta a guscio mix
nl: Assortimenten van fruit - noten en zaadjes
pt: Packs variados de combinações de frutas - nozes y sementes

en: Nuts, Fruit nuts
bg: Ядки
ca: Fruits secs
cs: Ořechy
da: Nødder
de: Nüsse
es: Frutos de cáscara, Frutos secos
fi: pähkinät
fr: Fruits à coques, Fruit à coque, Fruits à coque, Fruits à éclacle
he: אגוזים
hr: orašasti plodovi, orašasti plod
hu: Diófélék
it: Frutti a guscio, Frutti a noce, Frutta a guscio
ja: ナッツ
lt: Riešutai
nl: Noten
pl: Orzechy
pt: Nozes, Nozes de frutos
ro: Nuci
ru: Орехи
sv: Nötter, nöt
th: ถั่วเปลือกแข็ง
zh: 坚果

en: French nuts, Nuts from France
fr: Noix françaises
hr: Francuski orasi
lt: Prancūziški riešutai
nl: Noten uit Frankrijk

en: Salted nuts
de: Gesalzene Nüsse
fr: Fruits à coque salés, fruits à coques salés
hr: Slani orasi
it: frutta a guscio salata
lt: Riešutai su druska, Sūdyti riešutai
nl: Gezoute peulvruchten
pt: Frutos secos com sal
tr: Tuzlu çerezler

en: Unsalted nuts
de: Ungesalzene Nüsse
es: Mezcla de frutos secos
fr: Fruits à coque non-salés, fruits à coques non-salés
it: frutta a guscio insalata
nl: Ongezouten peulvruchten
pt: Frutos secos sem sal

en: Mixed nuts, Nut mix
de: Nussmischung
fr: Mélanges de fruits à coque
nl: Notenmelanges, Gemengde noten, notenmix

en: Salted peanuts
de: Gesalzene Erdnüsse
es: Cacahuetes salados, Cacahuates salados, Maní salado
fr: Cacahuètes salées
hr: Slani kikiriki
it: Arachidi salate
lt: Sūdyti žemės riešutai
nl: Gezouten pinda’s
pt: Amendoins com sal

en: Shelled nuts
bg: Белени ядки
ca: Fuita seca pelada
de: Nusskerne, geschälte Nüsse, Nüsse ohne Schale
es: Frutos de cáscara sin cáscara, Frutos secos sin cáscara
fi: pähkinät kuoressa
fr: Fruits à coques décortiqués, Fruits à coques décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni orasi
it: Noci sgusciate
lt: Gliaudyti riešutai, Lukštenti riešutai
nl: Gepelde noten
pt: Frutos secos com casca
zh: 带壳坚果

en: Shelled seeds
nl: Zaden (gepeld), Gepelde zaden

en: Almonds
bg: Бадеми
ca: Ametlles
da: Mandler
de: Mandeln
es: Almendras
fi: mantelit
fr: Amandes
hr: bademi, badem
hu: Mandula
it: Mandorle
ja: アーモンド
la: Prunus dulcis
lt: Migdolai
nl: Amandelen
pl: Migdały
pt: Amêndoas, amêndoa
ru: Миндаль
sv: Mandlar, mandel, Sötmandel
tr: Badem
zh: 杏仁

en: Marcona almonds
fr: Amandes Marcona
nl: Marcona amandelen

en: Unshelled almonds, Almonds (unshelled), Almonds with shell
it: Mandorle in guscio
nl: Amandelen(ongepeld), Ongepelde amandelen

en: Shelled almonds, Almonds (shelled)
bg: Белени бадеми
de: Mandeln ohne Schale
es: Almendras sin cáscara, Almendra con piel
fi: kuorelliset mantelit
fr: Amandes décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni bademi
hu: Héjas mandula
it: Mandorle sgusciate
lt: Gliaudyti migdolai, lukštenti migdolai
nl: Amandelen (gepeld), Gepelde amandelen

en: Whole almonds
de: ganze Mandeln
fr: Amandes entières
hr: Cijeli bademi
nl: Amandelen (heel)

en: Blanched almonds, Almonds (blanched)
cz: Mandle blanšírované
es: Almendras repeladas, Almendra pelada, Almendras sin piel, Láminas de almendra
fr: Amandes blanchies, Amandes émondées
it: Mandorle pelate
nl: Amandelen (geblancheerd), Geblancherde amandelen
pl: Migdały blanszowane
pt: Miolo de Amêndoa sem Pele
ro: Migdale blanșate